internal_storage/hyphen_dictionaries/hyph_la_liturgical.dic
.supe2r5i1i1
.supé2r5i1i1
.supéri1
.supe2r5ií1
.supe2r5í5i1
.supe2r1i1l
.supe2r1í1l
.supe2r1i1m
.supe2r1í1m
.supe2r1i2n3
.supe2r1í2n3
.su1pe2r1i2n4d1u1
.superi4n1d
.su1pe2r1í2n4d1u1
.superí4n1d
.supe2r1i2n4d1ú1
.superin5d2u1c
.superin5d2ú1c
.superind3ui.
.superindui1
.superínd3ui.
.superíndui1
.superin5d2u1x
.superin5d2ú1x
.supe2r1i2n3i2e1
.superi1ni1
.supe2r1i2n3i2é1
.supe2r1i2n3s4t
.1superi2n1s
.supe2r1í2n3s4t
.1superí2n1s
.supe2r1i1r
.supe2r1í1r
.1supe2r1i4s1s
.superi1s
.1supe2r1í4s1s
.superí1s
.supe4r3i1t
.súpe4r3i1t
.súperi1
.supe4r3í1t
.supé4r3i1t
.su1pe2r1i2u1
.supe2r1i2ú1
.supe3r2i3u4s.
.superiu1s
.supe2r1i1v
.supe2r1í1v
.supe2r1o2b3
.supero1
.supe2r1ó2b3
.superó1
.supe2r1o1c
.supe2r1ó1c
.su1pe2r1o1p
.su1pe2r1ó1p
.supe2r1o2r1d
.supero1r
.supe2r1ó2r1d
.superó1r
.1supe2r3s4
.1supé2r3s4
.1supertra2n2s1
.supe2r1t
.supe1rt4r
.supertra1
.supertra1n
.1supertrá2n2s1
.supertrá1
.supertrá1n
.su1pe2r1u1
.supe2r1ú1
.supe3r2u4m.
.superu1m
.supe3r4u4s.
.superu1s
.supra3s2c
.sup2r
.supra1
.1supra1s
.supra3s4t
.suprá3s4t
.suprá1
.suprá1s
.su5s4c6r
.1su1s
.su2s1c
.su3s4p
.sú3s4p
.sú1s
.su6s5pe1n
.suspe1
.su6s5pé1n
.suspé1
.1t2
.ta2m3etsi.
.ta1
.ta1m
.tame1
.tame1t
.tame2t1s
.tametsi1
.ta2m3étsi.
.tamé1
.tamé1t
.tamé2t1s
.tamétsi1
.te2r1i2u1
.te1
.te1r
.teri1
.ter2p2s
.te2r1p
.te2r1u1n
.teru1
.te2r1ú1n
.terú1
.1te1tra3e2t
.1te1t
.tet4r
.tetra1
.tetrae1
.tetra3g2n
.tetra1g
.1te1tra3s2t
.tetra1s
.the2o1
.t2h4
.the1
.theo3g2n
.theo1g
.1the3s2t
.the1s
.the3u1r
.the2u1
.thi3s2b
.thi1
.thi1s
.tra1i2a1
.t4r
.tra1
.trai1
.tra1i2e1
.tra1i1i1
.tra2n2s1
.tra1n
.trá2n2s1
.trá1
.trá1n
.trans1a2b1
.tra1nsa1
.trans1á2b1
.transá1
.trans1a2d1
.trans1á2d1
.t1ran3s2c6r
.tran2s1c
.tra1n3s2e2n1n
.transe1
.transe1n
.tra1n3s2é2n1n
.transé1
.transé1n
.t1ran3s2e1r
.t1rán3s2e1r
.tránse1
.t1ran3s2é1r
.tran4s3eremini.
.transe1re1
.transere1m
.transeremi1
.transeremi1n
.transeremini1
.tran4s3erémini.
.transeré1
.transeré1m
.transerémi1
.transerémi1n
.transerémini1
.tran4s3eremu4r.
.transeremu1
.transeremu1r
.tran4s3erému4r.
.transerému1
.transerému1r
.tran4s3erentu4r.
.transere1n
.1transere2n1t
.transerentu1
.transerentu1r
.tran4s3eréntu4r.
.transeré1n
.1transeré2n1t
.transeréntu1
.transeréntu1r
.tran4s3ere4r.
.transere1r
.trán4s3ere4r.
.tránsere1
.tránsere1r
.tran3s2i1l
.transi1
.trán3s2i1l
.tránsi1
.tran3s2í1l
.transí1
.transi2u1
.transi2ú1
.tran3s2u1
.trán3s2u1
.tran3s2ú1
.tran4s3u4l1m
.transu1l
.tra2n1ue1
.tranu1
.tri3e1n
.tri1
.trie1
.u1ni3a1n
.u1
.u1n
.uni1
.unia1
.u1ni3á1n
.uniá1
.u3n2i3u1scu3
.uniu1
.uniu1s
.uniu2s1c
.ute2r3ui1
.u1t
.ute1
.ute1r
.uteru1
.va6s5p
.1v
.va1
.va1s
.vá6s5p
.vá1
.vá1s
.ve2l1u1t
.ve1
.ve1l
.velu1
.vipe3r4
.vi1
.vi1p
.vipe1
.vípe3r4
.ví1
.ví1p
.vípe1
.vipé3r4
.vipé1
.1x2
.1z2
a1
á1
ab4s3ti1n
a1b
a2b1s
ab3s2t
absti1
ab4s3tí1n
abstí1
áb4s3ti1n
á1b
á2b1s
áb3s2t
ábsti1
ab4s3tra1c
abst4r
abstra1
ab4s3trá1c
abstrá1
a1e.
ae1
æ1
ǽ1
æ3a1
æ3á1
ǽ3a1
æ3e1
æ3é1
ǽ3e1
æ3i1
æ3í1
ǽ3i1
æ3o1
æ3ó1
ǽ3o1
æ3u1
æ3ú1
ǽ3u1
ai2e1
ai1
ai2é1
a1i4m.
ai1m
ai2o1
ai2ó1
ai6o4r.
aio1r
a1i1s
a1í1s
aí1
a3i4t.
ai1t
á3i4t.
ái1
ái1t
ai2u1
ái2u1
ai4un4t.
aiu1n
aiu2n1t
a2m3ui1
a1m
amu1
a2u1
a5ú1
á2u1
a3u4m.
au1m
á3u4m.
áu1m
a3u4s.
au1s
á3u4s.
áu1s
2a2x.
a1x
a2y1
á2y1
1b
2b.
2b1b
2b1d
2b1h
2b1j
b2l
2b1m
2b1n
2b1p
b2r
2b1s
b3s2t
2b1t
bu3u1
bu1
1c
4c.
2c1c
2c1d
c2h
2c2h.
ch4l
4ch3m
4ch3n
cho3e1
cho1
ch4r
4c2h3t
ci3e2n1t
ci1
cie1
cie1n
ci3e1t
c4l
2c1m
2c1n
con5s4t
co1
co1n
co2n1s
cón5s4t
có1
có1n
có2n1s
2cq
c6r
cri6s5p
cri1
cri1s
crí6s5p
crí1
crí1s
2c1s
2c1t
cu3
cui4ú1s
cui1
cuiú1
1cu4l1c
cu1l
1cú4l1c
cú1
cú1l
cu4l1n
cú4l1n
cu4l1p
cú4l1p
cu4m1b
cu1m
1cu4n1c
cu1n
cu4n1t
cu4r1s
cu1r
cu4s1t
cu1s
2c1z
1d
2d.
d2æ.
dæ1
d2a4m.
da1
da1m
2d1c
2d1d
2d1f
2d1g
2d3h
d4i4t.
di1
di1t
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n
2d1p
2dq
d2r
2d1s
du3u1
du1
4d1v
2d3w
e1
é1
ë1
e3a4m.
ea1
ea1m
é3a4m.
éa1
éa1m
e5an4t.
ea1n
ea2n1t
é5an4t.
éa1n
éa2n1t
e3a4t.
ea1t
é3a4t.
éa1t
ei2a1
ei1
ei2á1
éi2a1
éi1
e1i2e1
ei2é1
éi2e1
ei4o1
éi4o1
e3i4s.
ei1s
é3i4s.
éi1s
ei2u1
ei2ú1
éi2u1
ei4u4s.
eiu1s
éi4u4s.
éiu1s
e2l3ue1
e1l
elu1
2e4m.
e1m
2e4s.
e1s
e2s3r
2e4t.
e1t
e2u1
é2u1
e3ú1
e3u4m.
eu1m
é3u4m.
éu1m
e3u2m1d
e3u2m1p
e3u2n1c
eu1n
e3u4n1d
e3u2n1g
e3u2n1x2
e3u2n1t
é3u2n1t
éu1n
e3u4s.
eu1s
é3u4s.
éu1s
2e2x.
e1x
e3y1
1f
2f.
2f1f
f2l
2f1n
f2r
2f1t
1g
2g.
2g1d
ge3n2ua1
ge1
ge1n
genu1
2g1f
2g1g
g2l
2g1m
g2n
g4ne.
gne1
g2r
2g1s
1h
2h.
he3u.
he1
he2u1
2h1p
2h1t
hu2c5u1s
hu1
hu1c
hu1cu3
i1
í1
ï1
í5a1
í5æ1
í5e1
i1e4l.
ie1
ie1l
i3e4m.
ie1m
i3em4s.
ie2m1s
i3en4s.
ie1n
ie2n1s
i3en4t.
ie2n1t
i3e4s.
ie1s
i3e4t.
ie1t
í5i1
i5i.
i1i1
i3i4s.
ii1s
i5i4t.
ii1t
í5o1
i2oi2u1
io1
ioi1
i5o4r.
io1r
í5u1
i3u2d.
iu1
iu1d
i3u4m.
iu1m
i3un4t.
iu1n
iu2n1t
i3u4r.
iu1r
i3u4s.
iu1s
i2u2s3l
i2ú2s3l
iú1
iú1s
i2u2s3v
i2ú2s3v
2i2x.
i1x
1j
1k
1l
4l.
langú3e1
la1
la1n
la2n1g
langú1
la1ngu4ea1
langu2e1
langu1
la1ngu3era1
langue1r
langu3erá1
langu3ere.
languere1
langu3ére.
langu2é1
langué1r
languére1
langu3eri1
langu3éri1
langu3ero1
langu3erun4t.
langueru1
langueru1n
langueru2n1t
langu3érun4t.
languéru1
languéru1n
languéru2n1t
langu4e2s1c
langue1s
lang2u3i.
langu2i1
láng2u3i.
lá1
lá1n
lá2n1g
lángu2i1
lángu1
langu3imu4s.
langui1m
languimu1
languimu1s
langu3i4s1s
langui1s
langu3í4s1s
langu2í1
languí1s
langu3i2s1t
langu3í2s1t
langu5i4t.
langui1t
lángu5i4t.
lángui1t
2l1b
2l1c
2l1d
2l1f
l3f2t
2l1g
2l1k
2l1l
2l1m
2l1n
2l1p
2lq
2l1r
2l1s
4l1t
lu3i2a.
lu1
lui1
luia1
lú3i2a.
lú1
lúi1
lúia1
lu1u1n
luu1
lu1ú1n
luú1
4l1v
4l1z
1m
4m.
2m1b
2m1c
me4t3i2p1s
me1
me1t
meti1
meti1p
2m1d
2m1f
2m1l
2m1m
2m1n
2m1p
4mq
2m1r
2m1s
2m1t
6m1v
1n
2n.
2n1b
2n1c
nco3i1
nco1
4n1d
3ne.
ne1
2n1f
2n1g
ngu2a1
ngu1
ngu2á1
ngu2æ1
ngu2e1
ngu2é1
ngu4e4m.
ngue1m
ngu4e4s.
ngue1s
ngu4e4t.
ngue1t
ngu2i1
ngu2í1
ngu2i3o1
ngu4i4s.
ngui1s
ngu4i4t.
ngui1t
ngu6o1
ngu6ó1
ngu2u1
ngu2ú1
ngui5u4s.
ngu1i2u1
nguiu1s
2n1h
2n1j
2n1l
2n1m
2n1n
2n1p
2nq
2n1r
2n1s
n2s3f
n2s3m
2n1t
nu3i4s.
nu1
nui1
nui1s
4n1v
2n1x2
2n1z
o1
ó1
ob3s2c
o1b
o2b1s
ob4s3cu3
ob4s3cú1
œ1
œ8́1
oi2a1
oi1
ói2a1
ói1
oi2e1
ói2e1
o1i2o1
ói2o1
oi2u1
ói2u1
o3u4m.
ou1
ou1m
u1
u2s3que1
u1s
u2sq
u1s1qu4
2o2x.
o1x
o3y1
1p
2p.
pe2r3e3u1
pe1
pe1r
pe1re1
pe2r3é3u1
peré1
pé2r3e3u1
pé1
pé1r
pére1
pe2r3e3ú1
p2h
2p2h.
pha3e1l
pha1
phae1
ph2l
2ph1n
2p2h1p
p2h3p2h
ph8r
2p2h1t
p2l
2p1n
3p2ne2u1
pne1
3p2né2u1
pné1
po2t3e1n
po1
po1t
pote1
po2t3é1n
poté1
po2t3e1r
pó2t3e1r
pó1
pó1t
póte1
po2t3é1r
po2t3e1s
po2t3é1s
4p1p
p2r
1pro3s4p
pro1
pro1s
1pró3s4p
pró1
pró1s
2p1s
3p2si1c
psi1
4p3t
3p2t4r
2p1z
1qu4
1qui3a1
qui1
1qui3á1
1qui3æ1
1qui3ǽ1
1qui3e1
1qui3é1
1qui3o1
1qui3ó1
1qu1i5u1
1qui5ú1
qu6o.
quo1
qu6u1
qu6u4m.
quu1m
1r
4r.
r2æ.
ræ1
ræ3s4p
ræ1s
2r1b
2r1c
2r1d
2r1f
2r1g
r2h
rhe3u1s
rhe1
rhe2u1
ri3e.
ri1
rie1
r2i4m.
ri1m
2r1l
2r1m
2r1n
2r1p
2rq
4r3r
2r1s
2r1t
ru3i4s.
ru1
rui1
rui1s
ru3i4t.
rui1t
r4u4s.
ru1s
4r1v
2r1x
2r1z
1s
4s.
2s1b
2s1c
3s2cæ1
3s2cǽ1
3s2ce1
3s2cé1
3s2ci1
3s2cí1
3s2cœ1
3s2cy1
3s2cý1
2s1d
2s3d2e4m.
sde1
sde1m
2s1f
2s1g
2s1l
2s1m
2s1n
2s3ne.
sne1
2s1p
3s4pa2r1g
spa1
spa1r
3s4pá2r1g
spá1
spá1r
3s4pe1c
spe1
3s4pé1c
spé1
3s4pe2r1g
spe1r
3s4pé2r1g
spé1r
3s4pe2r1n
3s4pé2r1n
3s4pe2r1s
3s4pé2r1s
3s4pe1x
3s4pé1x
3s4phæ1
sp2h
3s4phǽ1
3s4ph8r
3s4pi1c
spi1
3s4pí1c
spí1
3s4pi1r
3s4pí1r
3s4ple1n
sp2l
sple1
3s4plé1n
splé1
3s4po1l
spo1
3s4pó1l
spó1
3s4po4n1d
spo1n
3s4pó4n1d
spó1n
3s4po2n1s
3s4pó2n1s
3s4pu1m
spu1
3s4pú1m
spú1
2sq
2s3que.
s1qu4
sque1
2s1r
4s1s
s3se.
sse1
2s1t
2s4t.
s4t1k
s2t3l
2s3t1n
2s2t3p
s2t3q
5s4tra2n1g
st4r
stra1
stra1n
5s4trá2n1g
strá1
strá1n
5s4tre1p
stre1
5s4tré1p
stré1
5s4tri1gi1
stri1
stri1g
5s4trígi1
strí1
strí1g
5s4tri2n1g
stri1n
5s4trí2n1g
strí1n
5s4tri2c1t
stri1c
5s4trí2c1t
strí1c
5s4tro1m
stro1
5s4trop2h
stro1p
1s2t3s
s2t3t
su2b5s4ta1n
su1
su1b
1su2b1s
sub3s2t
substa1
su3i4s.
sui1
sui1s
2s1v
1t
4t.
2t1b
2t1c
2t1d
2t1f
2t1g
t2h4
2t2h.
2th5m
2th5n
2t2h5p
2th5s
t2i4m.
ti1
ti1m
ti3n2ui1
ti1n
tinu1
ti1o.
tio1
2t1í2p1s
tí1
tí1p
t2l
2t1m
2t1n
2t1p
2tq
t4r
tru5u4m.
tru1
tru1u1
truu1m
tru5u4s.
truu1s
2t1s
2t1t
ú1
ü1
u3e4m.
ue1
ue1m
u3e4s.
ue1s
u3e4t.
ue1t
2ui.
ui1
u3i4s.
ui1s
u3i4t.
ui1t
u1i2u1
ui4u4s.
uiu1s
u4l1m
u1l
ú4l1m
ú1l
u1o3u1
uo1
uo3u1s
uo3ú1s
uoú1
u5u4m.
u1u1
uu1m
u5u4s.
uu1s
2u2x.
u1x
1v
ve6s5p
ve1
ve1s
vé6s5p
vé1
vé1s
1x
2x.
x2i4t.
xi1
xi1t
2xq
2x1t
x2u3i4t.
xu1
xui1
xui1t
x2ú3i4t.
xú1
xúi1
xúi1t
x2u4m.
xu1m
x2u4s.
xu1s
x2y1
xy4s3t
xy1s
y1
ý1
y3a1
y3e1
y3i1
y3o1
y3u1
y3æ1
y3y1
2y.
2y4s.
y1s
2y2x.
y1x
1z
2z.
z2m
2z1z
8́
